test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Num-njolj_gt-norm.yaml
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela: нёльнанъясысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill: нёльнанъясӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr: нёльнанъяслань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr: нёльнанъяссянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl: нёльнанъясӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Tra: нёльнанъясӧдті
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter: нёльнанъясӧдз
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: нёльнанъясӧй
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Gen: нёльнанъясӧйлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abl: нёльнанъясӧйлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: нёльнанъясӧйлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Acc: нёльнанъясӧс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg1: нёльнанъяснам
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Com: нёльнанъясӧйкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Car: нёльнанъясӧйтӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Cns: нёльнанъясӧйла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: нёльнанъясам
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: нёльнанъяссьым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: нёльнанъясам
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Apr: нёльнанъясӧйлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Egr: нёльнанъясӧйсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: нёльнанъясӧдым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg1: нёльнанъясӧдзым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: нёльнанъясыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Gen: нёльнанъясыдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl: нёльнанъясыдлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Dat: нёльнанъясыдлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Acc: нёльнанъястӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg2: нёльнанъяснад
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Com: нёльнанъясыдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Car: нёльнанъясыдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Cns: нёльнанъясыдла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: нёльнанъясад
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: нёльнанъяссьыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: нёльнанъясад
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Apr: нёльнанъясыдлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Egr: нёльнанъясыдсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: нёльнанъясӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: нёльнанъясӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: нёльнанъясыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Gen: нёльнанъясыслӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abl: нёльнанъясыслысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Dat: нёльнанъясыслы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Acc: нёльнанъяссӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg3: нёльнанъяснас
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Com: нёльнанъясыскӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Car: нёльнанъясыстӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Cns: нёльнанъясысла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: нёльнанъясас
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: нёльнанъяссьыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: нёльнанъясас
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Apr: нёльнанъясыслань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Egr: нёльнанъясыссянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: нёльнанъясӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: нёльнанъясӧдзыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom: нёльнанъясным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Gen: нёльнанъяснымлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abl: нёльнанъяснымлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Dat: нёльнанъяснымлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Acc: нёльнанъяснымӧс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl1: нёльнанъяснаным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Com: нёльнанъяснымкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Car: нёльнанъяснымтӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Cns: нёльнанъяснымла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: нёльнанъясаным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: нёльнанъяссьыным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: нёльнанъясаным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Apr: нёльнанъяснымлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Egr: нёльнанъяснымсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: нёльнанъясӧдным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: нёльнанъясӧдзным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom: нёльнанъясныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Gen: нёльнанъясныдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl: нёльнанъясныдлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Dat: нёльнанъясныдлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Acc: нёльнанъяснытӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl2: нёльнанъяснаныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Com: нёльнанъясныдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Car: нёльнанъясныдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Cns: нёльнанъясныдла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: нёльнанъясаныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: нёльнанъяссьыныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: нёльнанъясаныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Apr: нёльнанъясныдлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Egr: нёльнанъясныдсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: нёльнанъясӧдныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: нёльнанъясӧдзныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: нёльнанъясныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Gen: нёльнанъясныслӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl: нёльнанъясныслысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Dat: нёльнанъясныслы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Acc: нёльнанъяснысӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl3: нёльнанъяснаныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Com: нёльнанъясныскӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Car: нёльнанъясныстӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Cns: нёльнанъяснысла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: нёльнанъясаныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: нёльнанъяссьыныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: нёльнанъясаныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Apr: нёльнанъясныслань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Egr: нёльнанъясныссянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: нёльнанъясӧдныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: нёльнанъясӧдзныс
